North Carolina, session 2025, HB244.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 144-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 144-5. Flags to conform to law; display and handling of a flag of the United States of
America or the State of North Carolina an official governmental flag by State
institutions and other political subdivisions of the State.
…
(b) A flag of the United States of America or the State of North Carolina An official
governmental flag that is displayed by a State institution or a political subdivision of the State on
the premises of a building of a State institution or a political subdivision of the State under
G.S. 144-7.1 shall be handled, displayed, stored, and respectfully disposed of in accordance with
the federal Flag Code, 4 U.S.C. §§ 1-10."
SECTION 2. G.S. 144-7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 144-7. Display of official governmental flags; public restrictions.
(a) A county, city, consolidated city-county, or unified government shall not prohibit an
official governmental flag from being flown or displayed if the official governmental flag is
flown or displayed:displayed in accordance with all of the following:
(1) In accordance with the The patriotic customs set forth in 4 U.S.C. §§ 5-10, as
amended; andamended.
(2) Upon private or public property with the consent of either the owner of the
property or of any person having lawful control of the property.
(3) The provisions in G.S. 144-7.1.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, for For the purpose of protecting the
public health, safety, and welfare, reasonable restrictions on flag size, number of flags, location,
and height of flagpoles are not prohibited, provided that such restrictions shall not discriminate
against any official governmental flag in any manner.manner and shall comply with
G.S. 144-7.1.
(c) For purposes of this section, an "official governmental flag" shall mean any of the
following:is as defined in G.S. 144-7.1.
(1) The flag of the United States of America.
(2) The flag of nations recognized by the United States of America.
(3) The flag of the State of North Carolina.
*H244-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The flag of any state or territory of the United States.
(5) The flag of a political subdivision of any state or territory of the United
States."
SECTION 3. Chapter 144 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 144-7.1. Display of official governmental flags on State and local government property.
(a) Only the following official governmental flags may be flown or displayed by a State
institution or a political subdivision of the State on the premises of a building of a State institution
or a political subdivision of the State:
(1) The flag of the United States of America.
(2) The flag of the State of North Carolina.
(3) The flag of a county, city, or other governmental agency, school, or other
educational facility.
(4) The flag of any military branch of the United States of America.
(5) The Prisoner of War/Missing in Action (POW/MIA) flag.
(6) The Honor and Remember flag.
(7) The flag of nations recognized by the United States of America.
(8) The flag of any state or territory of the United States.
(9) The flag of a political subdivision of any state or territory of the United States.
(10) The flag of any Indian tribe or Indian group recognized by State or federal
law.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term "displayed" means the governmental flag or an
image of the governmental flag is placed anywhere, including the walls of a facility, employee
breakroom, and sidewalks.
(c) This section shall not apply to either of the following:
(1) A historic display at a museum.
(2) A reenactment of a prior war of the United States.
(d) Any employee of the State or political subdivision of the State who violates this
section is subject to disciplinary action, including termination from employment."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to violations
occurring on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 244-Third Edition